Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1891YH (3) 91 ll/js H.F. 744 Section 1. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. A county shall furnish or make 3 available on a publicly accessible internet site electronic 4 forms required by the county or county officers, including but 5 not limited to the auditor, treasurer, recorder, and sheriff, 6 that may include required filings, documents, and requests for 7 services such as licenses or other information as required 8 by law. The publicly accessible internet site shall also be 9 capable of electronically receiving a document submitted to the 10 county and shall ensure all confidential information, including 11 a personâs identity, is protected. The internet site shall not 12 use a personâs social security number as an identifier in the 13 system. 14 Sec. 2. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 15 following new subsection: 16 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. A city shall furnish or make available 17 on a publicly accessible internet site electronic forms 18 required by the city or city officers, including but not 19 limited to the city clerk, that may include required filings, 20 documents, and requests for services such as licenses or other 21 information as required by law. The publicly accessible 22 internet site shall also be capable of electronically 23 receiving a document submitted to the city and shall ensure all 24 confidential information, including a personâs identity, is 25 protected. The internet site shall not use a personâs social 26 security number as an identifier in the system. 27 Sec. 3. Section 554D.120, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 28 amended to read as follows: 29 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 554D.114, 30 subsection 6 , a governmental agency of this state , other than 31 a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of a 32 state or a state executive branch agency, department, board, 33 commission, authority, or institution, shall determine whether, 34 and the extent to which, the governmental agency will send and 35 -1- LSB 1891YH (3) 91 ll/js 1/ 2 H.F. 744 accept electronic records and electronic signatures to and from 1 other persons and otherwise create, generate, communicate, 2 store, process, use, and rely upon electronic records and 3 electronic signatures. 4